Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-917
Award; acceptance; effect.

Any award made pursuant to the authority granted by section 13-904 and accepted by the claimant and any final judgment in any suit brought pursuant to the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610 shall be final and conclusive on all officers of the political subdivision, except when procured by means of fraud. The acceptance by the claimant of such award shall be final and conclusive on the claimant and shall constitute a complete release by the claimant of any claim against the political subdivision and against the employee whose act or omission gave rise to the claim, by reason of the same subject matter.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 14, p. 632;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2414;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1029.